fi: Harjoittelutyynyn ominaisuudet: Liukumaton pohja; Sisältää kantokotelon/-laukun; Vaimennettu / hiljainen rakenne; Kaksipuolinen; Taitettava / siirrettävä; Sisältää metronomin; Vaihdettava soittopinta; Kanttilyöntivanne; Sisältää telineen; Viritettävä / säädettävä kireys; Vedenkestävä; Muu
en: Practice pad features: Anti-slip base; Carrying case/bag included; Dampening / low-noise design; Double-sided; Foldable / portable; Metronome included; Replaceable playing surface; Rimshot rim; Stand included; Tunable / adjustable tension; Water-resistant; Other
it: Caratteristiche del pad da pratica: Base antiscivolo; Custodia/borsa per il trasporto inclusa; Design smorzante/a bassa rumorosità; A due lati; Pieghevole/portatile; Metronomo incluso; Superficie di gioco sostituibile; Cerchio per rimshot; Supporto incluso; Tensione accordabile/regolabile; Resistente all'acqua; Altro
sv: Funktioner för övningspad: Halkskyddsbas; Bärväska ingår; Dämpande / tyst design; Dubbelsidig; Hopfällbar / bärbar; Metronom ingår; Utbytbar spelyta; Kantslagsyta (rimshot); Stativ ingår; Stämbar / justerbar spänning; Vattentålig; Annat
sl-SI: Lastnosti vadbene podloge: Nedrseč podstavek; Vključena torba/kovček za prenašanje; Blaženje/tiha zasnova; Obojestranska; Zložljiva/prenosna; Vključen metronom; Zamenljiva igralna površina; Obroč za rimshot; Vključeno stojalo; Uglasljiva/nastavljiva napetost; Vodoodporna; Drugo
hu: Gyakorlópad jellemzői: Csúszásgátló talp; Hordtáskával/tokkal; Tompító / alacsony zajszintű kialakítás; Kétoldalas; Összecsukható / hordozható; Beépített metronómmal; Cserélhető ütőfelület; Káva peremütéshez (rimshot); Állvánnyal; Hangolható / állítható feszességű; Vízálló; Egyéb
th: คุณสมบัติของแผ่นฝึกซ้อม: ฐานกันลื่น; รวมกระเป๋าพกพา/ถุงใส่; ดีไซน์ลดแรงกระแทก / ลดเสียงรบกวน; สองด้าน; พับได้ / พกพาได้; รวมเมโทรนอม; พื้นผิวสำหรับตีเปลี่ยนได้; ขอบตีริมช็อต; รวมขาตั้ง; จูนได้ / ปรับความตึงได้; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 練習墊功能: 防滑底座; 內含便攜盒/袋; 吸震/低噪音設計; 雙面; 可摺疊/便攜; 內建節拍器; 可更換打擊面; 鼓邊打擊圈; 附支架; 可調音 / 可調張力; 防潑水; 其他
da: Funktioner for øvepad: Skridsikker bund; Bæretaske/pose medfølger; Dæmpende / støjsvagt design; Dobbeltsidet; Foldbar / bærbar; Metronom medfølger; Udskiftelig spilleflade; Kant til kantslag (rimshot); Stativ medfølger; Justerbar spænding/kan stemmes; Vandafvisende; Andet
ja: 練習パッド機能: 滑り止めベース; キャリングケース/バッグ付属; 吸音/低騒音設計; 両面タイプ; 折りたたみ/ポータブル; メトロノーム付属; 交換可能な打面; リムショット用リム; スタンド付属; チューニング可能/テンション調整可能; 耐水性; その他
ru: Характеристики тренировочного пэда: Противоскользящее основание; Чехол/сумка в комплекте; Амортизирующая / малошумная конструкция; Двусторонний; Складной / портативный; Метроном в комплекте; Сменная игровая поверхность; Обод для римшота; Стойка в комплекте; Настраиваемое / регулируемое натяжение; Водонепроницаемый; Другое
vi: Tính năng của đệm tập trống: Đế chống trượt; Kèm hộp/túi đựng; Thiết kế giảm chấn / ít tiếng ồn; Hai mặt; Có thể gập lại / di động; Kèm máy nhịp; Bề mặt gõ có thể thay thế; Vành tạo âm rimshot; Kèm giá đỡ; Có thể chỉnh âm / độ căng; Chống nước; Khác
es: Características de la almohadilla de práctica: Base antideslizante; Estuche/bolsa de transporte incluida; Diseño amortiguador / de bajo ruido; De doble cara; Plegable / portátil; Metrónomo incluido; Superficie de toque reemplazable; Aro para rimshot; Soporte incluido; Tensión afinable / ajustable; Resistente al agua; Otro
fr: Caractéristiques du tapis d'entraînement: Base antidérapante; Étui/sac de transport inclus; Conception atténuante / silencieuse; Double face; Pliable / portable; Métronome inclus; Surface de frappe remplaçable; Cercle pour rimshots; Support inclus; Accordage / tension ajustable; Résistant à l’eau; Autre
nb: Funksjoner for øvelsespute: Sklisikker base; Bæreveske/bag inkludert; Dempende / støysvakt design; Dobbeltsidig; Sammenleggbar / bærbar; Metronom inkludert; Utskiftbar spilleflate; Kant for kantslag; Stativ inkludert; Stembar / justerbar stramming; Vannavstøtende; Annet
de: Funktionen des Übungspads: Rutschfeste Unterseite; Inklusive Tragetasche/-hülle; Dämpfendes/geräuscharmes Design; Beidseitig; Faltbar/tragbar; Inklusive Metronom; Austauschbare Spielfläche; Rimshot-Rand; Inklusive Ständer; Stimmbar/einstellbare Spannung; Wasserabweisend; Sonstige
cs: Vlastnosti cvičné podložky: Protiskluzová základna; Včetně přenosného pouzdra/tašky; Tlumicí / tichá konstrukce; Oboustranný; Skládací / přenosný; Včetně metronomu; Vyměnitelná úderová plocha; Ráfek pro rimshot; Včetně stojanu; Laditelný / nastavitelné napětí; Voděodolný; Jiné
ko: 연습 패드 기능: 미끄럼 방지 베이스; 휴대용 케이스/가방 포함; 댐핑/저소음 디자인; 양면형; 접이식/휴대용; 메트로놈 포함; 교체 가능한 연주 표면; 림샷 림; 스탠드 포함; 튜닝 가능/장력 조절 가능; 방수; 기타
el: Χαρακτηριστικά στρώματος εξάσκησης: Αντιολισθητική βάση; Περιλαμβάνεται θήκη/τσάντα μεταφοράς; Απόσβεση / Σχεδιασμός χαμηλού θορύβου; Διπλής όψης; Αναδιπλούμενο / Φορητό; Περιλαμβάνεται μετρονόμος; Αντικαταστάσιμη επιφάνεια παιξίματος; Στεφάνι rimshot; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση; Κουρδιζόμενο / Ρυθμιζόμενη τάση; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Značajke vježbovne podloge: Protuklizna baza; Uključena torbica/torba za nošenje; Prigušujući dizajn / dizajn s niskom razinom buke; Dvostrani; Sklopiv/prijenosan; Uključen metronom; Zamjenjiva površina za sviranje; Obruč za rimshot; Uključen stalak; Mogućnost ugađanja / prilagodljiva napetost; Vodootporno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Pad de treino, recursos: Base antiderrapante; Estojo/bolsa de transporte incluído; Design de amortecimento / baixo ruído; Face dupla; Dobrável / portátil; Metrônomo incluído; Superfície de toque substituível; Aro para rimshot; Suporte incluído; Afinável / tensão ajustável; Resistente à água; Outros
zh-CN: 哑鼓垫特点: 防滑底座; 附带便携包/袋; 减震 / 低噪音设计; 双面; 可折叠 / 便携; 附带节拍器; 可更换打击面; 边击鼓圈; 附带支架; 可调音 / 张力可调; 防水; 其他
lt-LT: Mokymosi pagalvėlių ypatybės: Neslystantis pagrindas; Pridedamas dėklas / krepšys; Slopinantis / tylus dizainas; Dvipusis; Sulankstomas / nešiojamasis; Pridedamas metronomas; Keičiamas mušimo paviršius; Rėmas lankelio smūgiams („Rimshot“); Pridedamas stovas; Derinamas / reguliuojamas įtempimas; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
bg-BG: Характеристики на тренировъчната подложка: Противоплъзгаща се основа; Включен калъф/чанта за носене; Демпфиращ / безшумен дизайн; Двустранен; Сгъваем / преносим; Включен метроном; Сменяема повърхност за свирене; Ръб за римшот; Включена стойка; Възможност за настройка / регулиране на напрежението; Водоустойчив; Друго
tr: Antrenman pedi özellikleri: Kaymaz taban; Taşıma çantası/kılıfı dahil; Sönümleme / düşük gürültülü tasarım; Çift taraflı; Katlanabilir / taşınabilir; Metronom dahil; Değiştirilebilir çalma yüzeyi; Rimshot kasnağı; Stand dahil; Akortlanabilir / ayarlanabilir gerginlik; Suya dayanıklı; Diğer
nl: Kenmerken oefenkussen: Antislip-onderkant; Inclusief draagtas; Dempend/geluidsarm ontwerp; Dubbelzijdig; Opvouwbaar/draagbaar; Inclusief metronoom; Vervangbaar speeloppervlak; Rimshot-rand; Inclusief standaard; Stembaar/verstelbare spanning; Waterbestendig; Overig
sk-SK: Funkcie cvičebnej podložky: Protišmyková základňa; Vrátane puzdra/tašky na prenášanie; Tlmiaci dizajn / dizajn s nízkou hlučnosťou; Obojstranné; Skladacie / prenosné; Vrátane metronómu; Vymeniteľný hrací povrch; Okraj na rimshot; Vrátane stojana; Laditeľné / nastaviteľné napnutie; Vodoodolné; Iné
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale saltelei de antrenament: Bază antiderapantă; Husă/geantă de transport inclusă; Design cu amortizare / zgomot redus; Cu două fețe; Pliabil / portabil; Metronom inclus; Suprafață de bătaie înlocuibilă; Cerc pentru rimshot; Stativ inclus; Acordabil / tensiune reglabilă; Rezistent la apă; Altele
pt-PT: Características do pad de treino: Base antiderrapante; Estojo/saco de transporte incluído; Design de amortecimento/baixo ruído; Dupla face; Dobrável/portátil; Metrónomo incluído; Superfície de toque substituível; Aro de rimshot; Suporte incluído; Tensão afinável/ajustável; Resistente à água; Outro
pl: Cechy pada treningowego: Antypoślizgowa podstawa; Pokrowiec/torba w zestawie; Tłumiąca / cicha konstrukcja; Dwustronny; Składany / przenośny; Metronom w zestawie; Wymienna powierzchnia gry; Obręcz do rimshotów; Statyw w zestawie; Możliwość strojenia / regulowany naciąg; Wodoodporny; Inne